North Carolina, session 2025, SB703.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 97-29 reads as rewritten:
"§ 97-29. Rates and duration of compensation for total incapacity.
(a) When an employee qualifies for total disability, the employer shall pay or cause to be
paid, as hereinafter provided by subsections (b) through (d) of this section, to the injured
employee a weekly compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) of his
average weekly wages, but not more than the amount established annually to be effective January
1 as provided herein, nor less than thirty dollars ($30.00) fifty dollars ($50.00) per week.
Beginning July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the North Carolina Industrial Commission shall
raise the maximum compensation herein in accordance with the percentage change in the June
Consumer Price Index computed by the Bureau of Labor Statistics and the June Consumer Price
Index for the prior year, provided that this percentage change is positive. The adjustment shall
be rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00)."
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 97-31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 97-31. Schedule of injuries; rate and period of compensation.
In cases included by the following schedule the compensation in each case shall be paid for
disability during the healing period and in addition the disability shall be deemed to continue for
the period specified, and shall be in lieu of all other compensation, including disfigurement, to
wit:
…
(21) In case of serious facial or head disfigurement, the Industrial Commission
shall award proper and equitable compensation not to exceed twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000). Fifty-six thousand dollars ($56,000). In case of enucleation
where an artificial eye cannot be fitted and used, the Industrial Commission
may award compensation as for serious facial disfigurement. Beginning July
1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the North Carolina Industrial Commission
shall raise the maximum compensation herein in accordance with the
percentage change in the June Consumer Price Index computed by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics and the June Consumer Price Index for the prior year,
provided that this percentage change is positive. The adjustment shall be
rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00).
*S703-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(22) In case of serious bodily disfigurement for which no compensation is payable
under any other subdivision of this section, but excluding the disfigurement
resulting from permanent loss or permanent partial loss of use of any member
of the body for which compensation is fixed in the schedule contained in this
section, the Industrial Commission may award proper and equitable
compensation not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).twenty-eight
thousand dollars ($28,000). Beginning July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter,
the North Carolina Industrial Commission shall raise the maximum
compensation herein in accordance with the percentage change in the June
Consumer Price Index computed by the Bureau of Labor Statistics and the
June Consumer Price Index for the prior year, provided that this percentage
change is positive. The adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest dollar
($1.00).
(24) In case of the loss of or permanent injury to any important external or internal
organ or part of the body for which no compensation is payable under any
other subdivision of this section, the Industrial Commission may award proper
and equitable compensation not to exceed twenty thousand dollars
($20,000).fifty-six thousand dollars ($56,000). Beginning July 1, 2026, and
annually thereafter, the North Carolina Industrial Commission shall raise the
maximum compensation herein in accordance with the percentage change in
the June Consumer Price Index computed by the Bureau of Labor Statistics
and the June Consumer Price Index for the prior year, provided that this
percentage change is positive. The adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest
dollar ($1.00)."
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 703-First Edition